src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON ABRODH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row C - Group II
                                      +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%>%^2UMLe                              FINAL1       ; ! class II special
                                          +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>oeji                                 FINAL1       ;
                                  +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>oej%^DISIMPi                         FINAL1       ;
                                   +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Use/NG:%>oej                                  FINAL1       ;

! Infinite forms
! --------------
                                                  +V+IV+Inf:%>odh                                  FINAL1       ;
                                               +V+IV+ConNeg:%>oeh                                  FINAL1       ;
                                                 +V+IV+VGen:%>oen                                  FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                                                  +V+IV+Ger:%>oeminie                              FINAL1       ;
                                           +V+IV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^2UMLeme                            FINAL1       ;
! Derivations
! -----------
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»oej@C.NeedNoun@     N_ODD ;
                                      +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»oem  flagNomActOdd    ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/les+A:%»%^PASSUMLel LES ;
                                 !  +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^2UMLesovv                          IV_PASSIVE_L ;
                                      !  +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML                            IV_PASSIVE_S ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Uml+Sg3:%»oegået%>%^1UMLa                      FINAL1       ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3:%»oegået%>%^iUMLi                      FINAL1       ;
             +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Uml+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»oegået%>%^iUML%^DISIMPi              FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Inf:%»oegået%>edh                          FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+ConNeg:%»oegået%>ieh                          FINAL1       ;
                                +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+VGen:%»oegået%>ien                          FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Act:%»oegået%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+Ger:%»oegået%>ieminie                      FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V+PrfPrc+Uml:%»oegået%>%^1UMLeme                    FINAL1       ;
                         +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»oest%>%^DISIMPe                      FINAL1       ;
                         +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»oest%>i                              FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»oest%>%^DISIMPi                      FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Inf:%»oest%>idh                            FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+ConNeg:%»oest%>%^DISIMPh                      FINAL1       ;
                                +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+VGen:%»oest%>%^DISIMPen                     FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Act:%»oest%>immie           FINAL1 ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Ger:%»oest%>%^DISIMPeminie                 FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+PrfPrc:%»oest%>amme                           FINAL1       ;
     +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»oest%»%^adteUMLall%>%^3sUMLa         FINAL1       ;
         +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»oest%»%^adteUMLall%>i                FINAL1       ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»oest%»%^adteUMLall%>%^DISIMPi        FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Inf:%»oest%»%^adteUMLall%>edh              FINAL1       ;
                +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+VGen:%»oest%»%^adteUMLall%>en               FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Act:%»oest%»%^adteUMLall%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+Ger:%»oest%»%^adteUMLall%>eminie           FINAL1       ;
              +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+PrfPrc:%»oest%»%^adteUMLall%>eme              FINAL1       ;
              +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V+ConNeg:%»oest%»%^adteUMLall%>0h               FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»oel%>%^DISIMPe                       FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»oel%>i                               FINAL1       ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»oel%>%^DISIMPi                       FINAL1       ;
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Inf:%»oel%>idh                             FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+ConNeg:%»oel%>%^DISIMPh                       FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+VGen:%»oel%>%^DISIMPen                      FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Act:%»oel%>immie           FINAL1 ;
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Ger:%»oel%>%^DISIMPeminie                  FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+PrfPrc:%»oel%>amme                            FINAL1       ;
      +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»oel%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa          FINAL1       ;
          +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»oel%»%^adteUMLadt%>i                 FINAL1       ;
  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»oel%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi         FINAL1       ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»oel%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh               FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»oel%»%^adteUMLadt%>en                FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»oel%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»oel%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie            FINAL1       ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»oel%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme               FINAL1       ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»oel%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h                FINAL1       ;
                     +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»oejahtj%>%^3sUMLa                    FINAL1       ;
                         +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»oejahtj%>i                           FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»oejahtj%>%^DISIMPi                   FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Inf:%»oejahtj%>edh                         FINAL1       ;
                                +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+VGen:%»oejahtj%>en                          FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Act:%»oejahtj%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ger:%»oejahtj%>eminie                      FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc:%»oejahtj%>eme                         FINAL1       ;
                              +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+ConNeg:%»oejahtj%>0h                          FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%»%^PASSUMLed%>%^DISIMPe               FINAL1       ;
                          +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»%^PASSUMLed%>i                       FINAL1       ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»%^PASSUMLed%>%^DISIMPi               FINAL1       ;
                                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+Inf:%»%^PASSUMLed%>idh                     FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der1+Der/d+V+ConNeg:%»%^PASSUMLed%>%^DISIMPh               FINAL1       ;
