src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Regular_verbs
abrodh:abr ABRODH "regna" ;
almodh:alm ABRODH "snöa" ;
båavtodh:båavt ABRODH "bli klart väder" ;
klæjmodh:klæjm ABRODH ;
slåptjodh:slåptj ABRODH "bli gjennomslagsføre (sleptjie )" ;
snjaafodh:snjaaf ABRODH ;
snjåahrodh:snjåahr ABRODH ;
tseavodh:tseav ABRODH "bli mycket hård snö" ;
åbrodh:åbr ABRODH "regna" ;
ålmodh:ålm ABRODH "snöa" ;
